Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-268
County supervisors; election; ballots; residency.

County supervisors shall be elected as provided in section 32-529. Elections shall be conducted as provided in the Election Act. In city districts, the ballots shall state which one of the supervisors is elected for the odd-numbered district and which one for the even-numbered district.

A supervisor elected after November 1986 need not be a resident of the district when he or she files for election as a supervisor from a given district, but a supervisor shall reside in the district in which he or she holds office.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 69, p. 152;

R.S.1913, § 1052;

C.S.1922, § 954;

C.S.1929, § 26-268;

R.S.1943, § 23-268;

Laws 1947, c. 64, § 7, p. 212;

Laws 1986, LB 812, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 539.

Election Act, see section 32-101.

County supervisors are elected for four years, but have staggered terms of office. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).